Illinois, session 104th, SB2244.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Funeral Directors and Embalmers Licensing 5Code is amended by adding Section 15-33 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 41/15-33 new)7    Sec. 15-33. Exceptions to unlicensed practice.8    (a) A license is not required under this Code for an organ 9procurement organization or its authorized representative to 10transport a deceased human body if the organ procurement 11organization is:12        (1) certified by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 13    Services;14        (2) transporting the deceased human body for the 15    purposes of organ or tissue donation;16        (3) transporting the deceased human body within the 17    viable time frame for organ or tissue donation; and18        (4) under the supervision of a licensed funeral 19    director.20    (b) Any organ procurement organization or its authorized 21representative that transports a deceased human body under 22this Section shall employ or contract with a funeral director 23licensed in this State to supervise and train its authorized   SB2244- 2 -LRB104 09416 AAS 19475 b1representative prior to transporting the deceased human body. 2The organ procurement organization or its authorized 3representative shall comply with all other applicable rules, 4regulations, and laws.5    (c) This Section shall not apply to a non-transplant 6anatomical donation organization. As used in this subsection 7(c), "non-transplant anatomical donation organization" means 8an entity who engages in the recovery, screening, testing, 9processing, distribution, or storage of human bodies, body 10parts, or tissues for purposes of education, research, or the 11advancement of medical, dental, or mortuary science.